Utah statutes.
73-18b-1.   Water safety rules and regulations -- Adoption.
(1)  The Board of Parks and Recreation may make rules necessary to promote
safety in swimming, scuba diving, and related activities on any waters where
public boating is permitted.
(2)  The Board of Parks and Recreation may consider recommendations of and
cooperate with other state agencies and the owners or operators of those
waters.
